Connecticut, session 2026, SB00453.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) On and after January 1,
2 2027, any person that issues or renews any property or casualty
3 insurance policy in this state, including, but not limited to, any policy of
4 a captive insurance company, for any fossil fuel infrastructure that
5 facilitates or expands the processing, exporting or transporting of oil,
6 methane gas or coal, other than home fuel delivery vehicles, or any other
7 infrastructure related to such activities, including, but not limited to,
8 wells, pipelines, terminals, refineries or utility-scale generation facilities,
9 shall be assessed a five per cent surcharge for the issuance or renewal of
10 any such policy. Any such surcharge shall be transmitted to the
11 Insurance Commissioner for deposit by said commissioner into the
12 climate resilience account described in subsection (b) of this section.
13 (b) The Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection shall
14 establish an account to be known as the "climate resilience account".
sSB453 / File No. 477 1

sSB453 File No. 477
15 Such account may receive any funds required to be deposited in such
16 account, including, but not limited to, any surcharge described in
17 subsection (a) of this section and any other funds, gift or donation
18 appropriated for or made to such account for the purposes described in
19 subsection (c) of this section. The funds in such account shall not lapse
20 at the end of any fiscal year and shall be available for the purposes
21 described in subsection (c) of this section.
22 (c) The Insurance Commissioner shall ensure the deposit of any such
23 surcharge described in subsection (a) of this section to the climate
24 resilience account established by the Commissioner of Energy and
25 Environmental Protection. The Commissioner of Energy and
26 Environmental Protection shall prescribe the allocation of such funds for
27 the purpose of disseminating flood risk data to communities throughout
28 the state, establishing a public awareness effort in communities with a
29 high risk of such flooding and providing grants to such communities for
30 the construction or installation of climate-resilient infrastructure that is
31 designed to mitigate such risk of flooding in such communities.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Subsec. (b), reference to the General Fund was deleted, in accordance
with standard drafting conventions.
ENV Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sSB453 / File No. 477 2

sSB453 File No. 477
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Insurance Dept.1 IF - Cost 120,000 157,000
Note: IF=Insurance Fund
Municipal Impact:
Municipalities Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Various Municipalities Potential None Potential
Revenue
Gain
Explanation
The bill results in a cost to the Insurance Fund of $120,000 in FY 27
and $157,000 annually thereafter associated with one new position for
an administrative officer. The bill creates a nonlapsing climate resilience
account and requires the Insurance Department to collect a 5%
surcharge on fossil fuel infrastructure insurance policies for deposit into
the account, necessitating an additional position. The bill may also result
in a potential revenue gain to municipalities for climate resilience grants
from the account, beginning in FY 28.
The annualized cost for the new Insurance Department position is
anticipated to be $84,000 in salary and $73,000 in fringe benefits
1The fringe benefit costs for employees funded out of other appropriated funds are
budgeted within the fringe benefit account of those funds, as opposed to the fringe
benefit accounts within the Office of the State Comptroller. The estimated active
employee fringe benefit cost associated with most personnel changes for other
appropriated fund employees is 85.92% of payroll in FY 27.
sSB453 / File No. 477 3

sSB453 File No. 477
beginning in FY 28. Partial-year personnel costs in FY 27 are anticipated
to be $63,000 and $55,000 respectively, reflecting an October 1, 2026 start
date. Other expenses for the new position are expected to total $2,000 in
FY 27 for a laptop and related supplies.
The bill requires the Commissioner of the Department of Energy and
Environmental Protection to establish the account and administer the
disbursement of funds, resulting in no cost to the state, as the
department has sufficient resources to meet the bill’s requirements.
To the extent that the account provides grant funding to
municipalities for climate resilience infrastructure, the bill may result in
a revenue gain to municipalities that apply for the funding, beginning
in FY 28. The magnitude and timing of any revenue gain is dependent
on the funds disbursed.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to inflation and grants disbursed from
the account.
sSB453 / File No. 477 4

sSB453 File No. 477
OLR Bill Analysis
sSB 453
AN ACT CONCERNING A CLIMATE CHANGE RELATED
SURCHARGE ON CERTAIN INSURANCE POLICIES.